Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.11.100

Initiative and referendum—Exercise of powers.

Except as provided in RCW 35A.11.090, and except that the number of registered voters needed to sign a petition for initiative or referendum shall be fifteen percent of the total number of names of persons listed as registered voters within the city on the day of the last preceding city general election, the powers of initiative and referendum in noncharter code cities shall be exercised in the manner set forth for the commission form of government in RCW 35.17.240 through 35.17.360, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 81 s 3.]

NOTES:

Sufficiency of petition in code city: RCW 35A.01.040.